District of Columbia statutes.
33-512

Repealed

One as both general and limited partner.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 657, Pub. L. 87-716, § 12
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856
1981 Ed., § 41-212.
1973 Ed., § 41-412.